Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5327
Reserves authorized.

At any time after the first year the fund is effective the director may: (1) Reserve a dollar amount equal to thirty-three percent of a capitalization grant made pursuant to section 1452 of the Safe Drinking Water Act and add the funds reserved to any funds provided to the state pursuant to section 601 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act; and (2) reserve in any year a dollar amount up to the dollar amount that may be reserved under subdivision (1) of this section of the capitalization grants made pursuant to section 601 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and add the reserved funds to any funds provided to the state pursuant to section 1452 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB307, § 4.